sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Igre na prostem > Igre na travi > Kompleti za cornohole: Dodatki za cornhole; Vreče za cornhole; Deske za štrbunk
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Lauko žaidimai > Pievos žaidimai > „Cornhole“ rinkiniai: Kornholo priedai; Kornholo krepšiai; „Cornhole“ žaidimo lentos
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Outdoor Games > Lawn Games > Cornhole Sets: Cornhole Accessories; Cornhole Bags; Cornhole Boards
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Giochi all'aperto > Giochi da prato > Set cornhole: Accessori da cornhole; Sacchetti da cornhole; Tavole da cornhole
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Παιχνίδια εξωτερικού χώρου > Παιχνίδια γρασιδιού > Σετ Cornhole: Αξεσουάρ cornhole; Σακουλάκια cornhole; Σανίδες cornhole
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trò chơi ngoài trời > Trò chơi trên cỏ > Bộ trò chơi cornhole: Phụ kiện chơi ném túi đậu; Túi đậu chơi ném túi; Bảng chơi ném túi đậu
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Exteriérové hry > Hry na trávniku > Súpravy hry cornhole: Príslušenstvo pre hru cornhole; Vaky na cornhole; Hracie dosky na cornhole
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Jogos de exterior > Jogos de relvado > Conjuntos de cornhole: Acessórios de cornhole; Sacos de cornhole; Tábuas de cornhole
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Jeux d'extérieur > Jeux de plein air > Ensembles de cornhole: Accessoires de cornhole; Sacs de cornhole; Planches de cornhole
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Jogos ao ar livre > Jogos de gramado > Conjuntos de jogo dos sacos: Acessórios para cornhole; Sacos para cornhole; Tábuas para cornhole
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 戶外遊戲 > 草地遊戲 > 布袋球組: 沙包投擲遊戲配件; 投擲沙包; 沙包投擲板
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Utendørsspill > Hagespill > Cornhole-sett: Tilbehør til cornhole; Cornhole-poser; Cornhole-brett
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 户外游戏 > 草坪游戏 > 沙包游戏套装: 玉米洞游戏配件; 玉米洞游戏沙包; 玉米洞游戏板
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Gry na świeżym powietrzu > Gry na trawie > Zestawy Cornhole: Akcesoria do cornhole; Woreczki do cornhole; Deski do cornhole
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Szabadtéri játékok > Gyepjátékok > Cornhole-készletek: Cornhole kiegészítők; Cornhole babzsákok; Cornhole táblák
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ulkopelit > Pihapelit > Cornhole-setit: Cornhole-tarvikkeet; Cornhole-pussit; Cornhole-laudat
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Игры на открытом воздухе > Игры на лужайке > Наборы для корнхола: Аксессуары для корнхола; Мешочки для корнхола; Доски для корнхола
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Udendørsspil > Havespil > Majsposesæt: Tilbehør til cornhole; Cornhole-poser; Cornhole-brætter
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Açık Hava Sporları > Çim Oyunları > Cornhole Setleri: Cornhole aksesuarları; Cornhole torbaları; Cornhole tahtaları
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Jocuri în aer liber > Jocuri pe iarbă > Seturi cornhole: Accesorii pentru cornhole; Saci pentru cornhole; Planșe pentru cornhole
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Utomhuslek > Utomhusspel > Cornhole-set: Cornhole-tillbehör; Cornhole-påsar; Cornhole-bräden
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Spiele im Freien > Rasenspiele > Cornhole-Sets: Cornhole-Zubehör; Cornhole-Bags; Cornhole-Boards
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > เกมกลางแจ้ง > เกมบนสนามหญ้า > ชุดคอร์นโฮล: อุปกรณ์เสริมคอร์นโฮล; ถุงทรายคอร์นโฮล; กระดานคอร์นโฮล
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Igre na otvorenom > Igre na travnjaku > Setovi za cornhole: Dodaci za cornhole; Torbe za cornhole; Ploče za cornhole
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zahradní a venkovní hry > Hry na trávník > Sady na cornhole: Příslušenství na cornhole; Sáčky na cornhole; Hrací desky na cornhole
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Игри на открито > Игри на трева > Комплекти за „Корнхол“: Аксесоари за корнхол; Чанти за корнхол; Дъски за корнхол
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Juegos al aire libre > Juegos sobre hierba > Juegos de Cornhole: Accesorios de cornhole; Bolsas de cornhole; Tableros de cornhole
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 야외 놀이 > 필드 게임 > 콘홀 세트: 콘홀 액세서리; 콘홀 백; 콘홀 보드
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Buitenspelen > Lawn games > Cornhole-sets: Cornhole-accessoires; Cornhole-zakjes; Cornhole-borden
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 屋外ゲーム > バックヤードゲーム > コーンホールセット: コーンホールアクセサリー; コーンホールバッグ; コーンホールボード